zh-CN: 玻璃窑炉烧制应用: 退火; 珠子退火; 铸造; 珐琅（玻璃烧结于金属）; 熔合; 窑制（通用）; 热弯; 点熔; 测试窑炉/样品窑炉; 其他
th: การใช้งานเตาเผาแก้ว: การอบอ่อน; การอบลูกปัด; การหล่อ; การลงยา (แก้วบนโลหะ); การหลอมรวม; การขึ้นรูปด้วยเตาเผา (ทั่วไป); การหลอมตกท้องช้าง; การหลอมติด; เตาเผาทดสอบ/เตาเผาตัวอย่าง; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Stiklo krosnies degimo paskirtis: Atkaitinimas; Karoliukų atkaitinimas; Liejimas; Emaliavimas (stiklas ant metalo); Lydymas; Formavimas krosnyje (bendras); Lenkimas karščiu; Taškinis lydymas; Bandymų / pavyzdžių krosnis; Kita
hu: Üvegégető kemence alkalmázása: Feszültségmentesítés (hőkezelés); Üveggyöngy feszültségmentesítése; Öntés; Zománcozás (üveg fémen); Üvegrogyasztás (fusing); Kemencés üvegalakítás (általános); Formába rogyasztás (slumping); Tapadásos rogyasztás (tack fusing); Tesztkemence / mintakemence; Egyéb
de: Verwendungszweck des Glasofenbrands: Kühlen (Entspannen); Perlenkühlen; Gießen; Emaillieren (Glas auf Metall); Fusing; Kilnforming (allgemein); Absenken; Tack Fusing; Testofen/Probenofen; Sonstige
ro-RO: Aplicație pentru arderea în cuptor a sticlei: Recoacere; Recoacere mărgele; Turnare; Emailare (sticlă-pe-metal); Fuziune; Termoformare sticlă (general); Curbare prin încălzire; Fuziune ușoară; Cuptor de testare/Cuptor pentru mostre; Altele
nl: Stooktoepassing van glasoven: Uitgloeien; Kralen uitgloeien; Gieten; Emailleren (glas-op-metaal); Fusing; Kilnforming (algemeen); Slumping; Tack fusing; Testoven/proefoven; Overig
el: Εφαρμογή ψησίματος κλιβάνου υαλουργίας: Ανόπτηση; Ανόπτηση χαντρών; Χύτευση; Σμάλτωση (γυαλί σε μέταλλο); Σύντηξη; Μορφοποίηση σε καμίνι (γενικά); Slumping (κάμψη); Tack fusing; Καμίνι δοκιμής/Καμίνι δειγμάτων; Άλλο
vi: Ứng dụng nung thủy tinh: Ủ thủy tinh; Ủ hạt; Đúc; Tráng men (thủy tinh trên kim loại); Nóng chảy; Tạo hình bằng lò nung (thông thường); Đúc võng (Slumping); Nung dính (Tack fusing); Lò nung thử nghiệm/Lò nung mẫu; Khác
pt-BR: Aplicação de queima do forno de vidro: Recozimento; Recozimento de contas; Fundição; Esmaltação (vidro no metal); Fusão; Modelagem em forno (geral); Slumping; Fusão parcial (tack fusing); Forno de teste/Forno de amostragem; Outro
tr: Cam fırını pişirme uygulaması: Tavlama; Boncuk tavlama; Döküm; Mineleme (metal üzeri cam); Füzyon; Fırın şekillendirme (genel); Çökertme; Kısmi füzyon; Test fırını/Numune fırını; Diğer
sv: Användningsområde för glasugnsbränning: Spänningskylning; Spänningskylning av pärlor; Gjutning; Emaljering (glas på metall); Fusing; Ugnformning (allmän); Slumping; Tack fusing; Testugn/provugn; Övrigt
en: Glass kiln firing application: Annealing; Bead annealing; Casting; Enameling (glass-on-metal); Fusing; Kilnforming (general); Slumping; Tack fusing; Test kiln/Sample kiln; Other
cs: Aplikace výpalu ve sklářské peci: Chlazení (annealing); Chlazení korálků; Odlévání; Smaltování (sklo na kov); Spékání (fusing); Tvarování v peci (obecné); Lehání skla (slumping); Bodové spékání (tack fusing); Zkušební / vzorkovací pec; Ostatní
da: Anvendelse i glasovn/brænding: Afspænding; Afspænding af perler; Støbning; Emaljering (glas-på-metal); Fusing; Ovnsmeltning (generel); Slumping; Tack-fusing; Testovn/prøveovn; Andet
sl-SI: Aplikacija za žganje stekla v steklarski peči: Temperiranje; Temperiranje kroglic; Ulivanje; Emajliranje (steklo na kovino); Taljenje (fusing); Oblikovanje v peči (splošno); Ukrivljanje (slumping); Točkovno spajanje (tack fusing); Testna peč/vzorčna peč; Drugo
ru: Область применения обжига стекла в печи: Отжиг; Отжиг бусин; Литье; Эмалирование (стекло на металле); Фьюзинг; Формование в печи (общее); Моллирование; Рельефный фьюзинг; Тестовая / пробная печь; Другое
fr: Application de cuisson du verre au four: Recuisson; Recuisson de perles; Moulage; Émaillage (verre sur métal); Fusionnage; Thermoformage (général); Bombage; Fusion partielle; Four d’essai/Four à échantillons; Autre
ko: 유리 가마 소성 앱: 어닐링(서냉); 비드 어닐링; 캐스팅; 에나멜링(금속 위 유리); 퓨징; 가마 성형(일반); 슬럼핑; 택 퓨징; 테스트 가마/샘플 가마; 기타
bg-BG: Приложение на пещта за стъкло: Темпериране; Темпериране на мъниста; Отливане; Емайлиране (стъкло върху метал); Сливане (fusing); Формоване в пещ (общо); Огъване (slumping); Точково сливане (tack fusing); Тестова/пробна пещ; Друго
fi: Lasiuunin polton käyttötapa: Hehkutus; Helmien hehkutus; Valu; Emalointi (lasi metallille); Sulatus; Uunimuovaus (yleinen); Taivutus; Kevytsulatus; Testiuuni/näyteuuni; Muu
nb: App for avfyring av glassovn: Avspenning; Perleavspenning; Støping; Emaljering (glass på metall); Fusing; Ovnforming (generelt); Slumping; Tack fusing; Testovn/prøveovn; Annet
es: Aplicación para la cocción de vidrio en horno: Recocido; Recocido de cuentas; Fundición; Esmaltado (vidrio sobre metal); Fusión; Termoformado de vidrio (general); Curvado; Fusión por puntos; Horno de prueba/Horno de muestras; Otra
pl: Zastosowanie wypału w piecu do szkła: Odprężanie; Odprężanie koralików; Odlewanie; Emaliowanie (szkło na metalu); Fusing (stapianie); Formowanie w piecu (ogólne); Slumping (zapadanie); Tack fusing (lekkie stapianie); Piec testowy / piec na próbki; Inne
zh-TW: 玻璃窯爐燒製用途: 退火; 琉璃珠退火; 鑄造; 琺瑯 (金屬燒玻璃); 熔合; 窯燒成型 (一般); 熱彎; 點熔; 測試窯/樣品窯; 其他
pt-PT: aplicação de queima de vidro em forno: Recozimento; Recozimento de contas; Fundição; Esmaltagem (vidro sobre metal); Fusão; Termoformagem de vidro (geral); Slumping; Fusão parcial; Forno de ensaio/forno de amostragem; Outra
ja: ガラス窯焼成適用: アニーリング; ビーズアニーリング; キャスティング; エナメル加工 (ガラスオンメタル); フュージング; キルンフォーミング (一般); スランピング; タックフュージング; テストキルン/サンプルキルン; その他
it: Applicazione per la cottura del vetro in forno: Ricottura; Ricottura di perle; Colata; Smaltatura (vetro su metallo); Fusione; Termoformatura (generale); Curvatura; Tack fusing; Forno di prova/forno per campioni; Altro
sk-SK: Použitie sklárskej pece na vypaľovania: Žíhanie; Žíhanie korálikov; Odlievanie; Smaltovanie (sklo na kove); Spékanie; Tvarovanie v peci (všeobecné); Líhanie; Bodové spékanie; Testovacia pec/vzorková pec; Iné
hr-HR: Primjena pečenja u staklanskoj peći: Žarenje; Žarenje perli; Lijevanje; Emajliranje (staklo na metal); Stapanje; Oblikovanje u peći (općenito); Savijanje u kalupu; Djelomično stapanje (tack fusing); Probna peć / peć za uzorke; Ostalo